Hawaii statutes.
§145-10 Administrative penalties. (a)
The department may, after notice and opportunity for hearing, revoke or suspend
any license issued under this chapter for any violation of this chapter.

(b) The department may, after notice and
opportunity for hearing, fine any person who violates this chapter or any rule
adopted under this chapter, not more than $5,000 for each separate offense.
Each day or instance of violation shall constitute a separate offense. Any
action taken to impose or collect the penalty provided for in this subsection
shall be considered a civil action. [L 1951, c 74, pt of §1; RL 1955, §23-10;
am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §145-10; am L 1983, c 258,
§4; am L 1985, c 110, §1]

Cross References

Administrative procedure,
see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next